Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2223
Registered nurse; licensed practical nurse; reciprocity; continuing competency requirements; military spouse; temporary license.

(1) An applicant for a license as a registered nurse or a licensed practical nurse based on licensure in another jurisdiction shall meet the continuing competency requirements as specified in rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the board in addition to the standards set by the board pursuant to section 38-126.

(2) An applicant who is a military spouse may apply for a temporary license as provided in section 38-129.01.

Laws 1953, c. 245, § 8(2), p. 841;

Laws 1975, LB 422, § 10;

Laws 1980, LB 847, § 6;

Laws 1995, LB 563, § 19;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,132.15;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 779;

Laws 2017, LB88, § 72.

The Board of Nursing has power to deny a license upon proof applicant is guilty of unprofessional conduct, and upon review de novo district court may not substitute its own judgment on that issue. Scott v. State ex rel. Board of Nursing, 196 Neb. 681, 244 N.W.2d 683 (1976).